Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-964
Autism Treatment Program; created; administration; funding.

The Autism Treatment Program is created. The program shall be administered by the department.

Laws 2007, LB482, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1,140;

Laws 2009, LB27, § 4.